test/src/gt-norm-yamls/N-vuvll_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct. 


  Noun - vuʹvll a-stem kahle: # Noun - full paradigm
     vuʹvll+N+Sg+Nom+Indef: vuʹvll
     vuʹvll+N+Sg+Gen+Indef: vuuʹl
     vuʹvll+N+Sg+Acc+Indef: vuuʹl
     vuʹvll+N+Sg+Ill+Indef: voulla
     vuʹvll+N+Sg+Loc+Indef: vuuʹlest
     vuʹvll+N+Sg+Com+Indef: vuuʹlin
     vuʹvll+N+Ess+Indef: vuʹvllen
     vuʹvll+N+Par+Indef: vuʹvlled
     vuʹvll+N+Sg+Abe+Indef: [vuuʹltaa, vuuʹltää]
     vuʹvll+N+Pl+Nom+Indef: vuuʹl
     vuʹvll+N+Pl+Gen+Indef: vuuʹli
     vuʹvll+N+Pl+Acc+Indef: vuuʹlid
     vuʹvll+N+Pl+Ill+Indef: vuuʹlid
     vuʹvll+N+Pl+Loc+Indef: vuuʹlin
     vuʹvll+N+Pl+Com+Indef: vuuʹlivuiʹm
     vuʹvll+N+Pl+Abe+Indef: [vuuʹlitaa, vuuʹlitää]
